Utah statutes.
13-14a-4.   Termination of retailing agreement at will.

Any retailing agreement between a dealer and a manufacturer or wholesaler that is entered into or renewed after May 1, 1989, shall terminate at will, notwithstanding any agreement or law to the contrary, upon written notice of termination from the dealer.  Any right arising from a prior breach of the contract survives a termination under this section.

